Wyoming statutes. Title 25 Institutions of the State
Article 4. Juvenile Treatment Program

§§ 25-10-401 through 25-10-404.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1990, ch. 24, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1987, ch. 153, § 1, related to the juvenile treatment program at the Wyoming state hospital. For provisions pertaining to the Juvenile Justice Act, see §
14-9-201 et seq. For provisions pertaining to children in need of supervision, see §

14-6-401

et seq.